Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 5. State Corporation Commission; Surety Bonds
on Employees; Transportation of Explosives,
Convicts
and Insane Persons.

§ 56-128.
Commission’s examination of all transportation companies, etc.

The Commission may examine all the railroads and other transportation companies, and the works and equipment thereof so that it may keep itself informed as to their physical condition, the manner in which they are operating with reference to the security
and accommodation of the public, and whether they are in compliance with the provisions of their charters and the laws of the Commonwealth. The provisions of this section shall apply to all railroads and other transportation companies,
and to the corporations, trustees, receivers, or other person owning or operating the same.

History.
Code 1919, § 3718; 1987, c. 185.

Cross references.

As to examination of physical condition of public service companies, see § 56-43.

For provisions concerning the powers and duties of the State Corporation Commission, see Va. Const., Art. IX, § 2; §§

12.1-12

through

12.1-17

.

§ 56-129.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

§ 56-129.1.
Participation in the Federal Railroad Administration Safety and Inspection Program.

The State Corporation Commission shall have the authority to participate in carrying out safety inspection activities in connection with any rule, regulation, order, or standard prescribed by the Secretary of Transportation of the United States under
the authority of the Federal Railroad Safety Act (49 U.S.C. § 20101 et seq.) as delegated to the Commonwealth by the Federal Railroad Administration, provided that the Commission shall comply with all the requirements imposed by the
United States Code. The Commission shall employ such expert, professional or other assistance as is necessary to carry out the activities authorized by this section. Safety inspectors shall attain the Federal Railroad Administration
qualifications necessary to qualify the Commonwealth for federal funds. A maximum of $200,000 paid to the State Corporation Commission under §§

58.1-2660

through

58.1-2662

shall be allocated to this program.

The Commission shall have the authority to adopt such rules in conformance with the Federal Railroad Safety Act that are necessary for the promulgation of railroad safety within the Commonwealth.

History.
1981, c. 363; 1987, c. 145; 1996, cc. 114, 157.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 114 and 157 are identical, and, in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “safety inspection” for “track inspection,” substituted “(49 U.S.C. § 20101 et seq.) as delegated to the Commonwealth by the Federal
Railroad Administration” for “United States Code, Title 45, Chapter 13,” and deleted “Title 45, Section 435” following “United States Code”; substituted “Safety inspectors” for “Such track inspectors” in the third sentence; substituted
“$200,000” for “$150,000” in the fourth sentence; and deleted “track” following “railroad” in the second paragraph.

§ 56-130.
Penalty for failure to make necessary repairs, etc.

If any railroad, or other railroad company, when directed by a valid order of the Commission, refuses or fails to comply with any requirement imposed pursuant to § 56-129.1, such company shall, in the discretion of the Commission, be fined in accordance
with federal guidelines.

History.
Code 1919, § 3932; 1996, cc. 114, 157.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 114 and 157 are identical, and rewrote this section which formerly read: “If any railroad, or other transportation company, when directed by a valid order of the Commission, refuses or fails to make necessary repairs or additions
to its rolling stock, or addition or improvement to its equipment, or any enlargement of or improvement in its stations, station houses, wharves, or landings, or any change in the mode of operating its road or transportation line,
or in conducting its business, which the Commission deems reasonable and expedient in order to promote the security, convenience, and accommodation of the public, such company shall, in the discretion of the Commission, be fined not
less than $100 nor more than $1,000.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
15 M.J. Railroads, § 28.

§ 56-131.
Accident Investigation and Reporting.

The Commission shall investigate the cause of any accident on any railroad which, in its judgment, requires investigation. The Commission shall require every common carrier by railroad doing business in this Commonwealth to file all reports required by
the Federal Railroad Administration pursuant to the Federal Accidents Reports Act and regulations issued pursuant thereto to the Commission at its office in Richmond, Virginia, provided that neither such report nor any part thereof
shall be admitted as evidence in any suit or action for damages growing out of any matter mentioned in such report.

History.
Code 1919, § 3737; 1996, cc. 114, 157.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 114 and 157 are identical, and, in the first sentence, substituted “shall investigate” for “may investigate,” substituted “railroad” for “transportation line,” substituted “requires” for “shall require,” and added the second
sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, § 2.

§ 56-132.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

§§ 56-133 through 56-135.

Repealed by Acts 1956, c. 492.

§§ 56-136 through 56-138.

Repealed by Acts 1979, c. 405.

§ 56-139.
Repealed by Acts 1996, cc. 114 and 157.

§ 56-140.
Penalty for violation of chapter, orders, rules or regulations.

Any transportation company which violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or refuses to conform to or obey any lawful rule, order, or regulation of the Commission relating to the provisions of this chapter, may, when not otherwise provided in this
chapter, be fined by the Commission, in its discretion, in a sum not exceeding $500 for each offense, and each day such company continues to violate any provision of this chapter, or continues to refuse to obey or perform any lawful
rule, order, or regulation prescribed by the Commission, shall be a separate offense.

History.
Code 1919, § 3925.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
3B M.J. Carriers, §§ 2, 96.

§ 56-141.
Repealed by Acts 1994, c. 314.